Massachusetts, session 194th, H579.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 154
of the acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by inserting after the fifteenth paragraph the
following paragraph:-
For a person who, because of a temporary or permanent disability arising from
intellectual, sensory, emotional, physical or environmental factors, or other specific learning
disabilities, is or would be unable to pass the written examination, the board shall create a
practical alternative assessment to the test requirement of the eligibility criteria for certification
as a provisional educator and certification as a provisional educator with advanced standing.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 180 days following its passage.
of 1